Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.370

Notices of infraction—Filing—Warrant—Notice and order, withhold property—Service—Civil penalties.

(1) A notice of infraction issued under this chapter constitutes a notice of assessment for purposes of this section.

(2) A notice of infraction becomes final thirty days from the date it is served upon the contractor unless a timely appeal of the infraction is received as provided in RCW 18.27.270.

(3) When a notice of infraction becomes final, the director or the director's designee may file with the clerk of any county within the state, a warrant in the amount of the notice of infraction, plus interest, penalties, and a filing fee of twenty dollars. The clerk of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the contractor mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment, penalty, fine due on it, or filing fee, and the date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to, and interest in, all real and personal property of the contractor against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon the warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued against rights or property upon judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state in a manner provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing fee which will be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the contractor within three days of filing with the clerk.

(4) The director or the director's designee may issue to any person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and order to withhold and deliver property of any kind whatsoever when he or she has reason to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that is or will become due, owing, or belonging to a contractor upon whom a notice of infraction has been served by the department for payments, penalties, or fines due to the department. The effect of a notice and order is continuous from the date the notice and order is first made until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.

The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed, or by an authorized representative of the director. A person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the party served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of the department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the director or the director's authorized representative. The director shall hold the property in trust for application on the contractor's indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may render judgment by default against the party for the full amount claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a notice and order to withhold and deliver wages is served upon a contractor upon whom a notice of infraction has been served, the contractor may assert in the answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.

(5) In addition to the procedure for collection of a payment, penalty, or fine due to the department as set forth in this section, the department may recover civil penalties imposed under this chapter in a civil action in the name of the department brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred.

[ 2011 c 301 s 3; 2011 c 15 s 3; 2001 c 159 s 6.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 c 15 s 3 and by 2011 c 301 s 3, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).